de: Reizt die Augen und die Haut, R36/38
en: Irritating to eyes and skin, R36/38
cs: Dráždí oči a kůži, R36/38
dk: Irriterer øjnene og huden, R36/38
el: Ερεθίζει τα µάτια και το δέρµα, R36/38
es: Irrita los ojos y la piel, R36/38
et: Ärritab silmi ja nahka, R36/38
fi: Ärsyttää silmiä ja ihoa, R36/38
fr: Irritant pour les yeux et la peau, R36/38
hu: Szem- és bőrizgató hatású, R36/38
it: Irritante per gli occhi e la pelle, R36/38
lt: Dirgina akis ir odą, R36/38
lv: Kairina acis un ādu, R36/38
mt: Jirrita l-għajnejn u l-ġilda, R36/38
nl: Irriterend voor de ogen en de huid, R36/38
no: Irriterer øynene og huden, R36/38
pl: Działa drażniąco na oczy i skórę, R36/38
pt: Irritante para os olhos e pele, R36/38
sk: Dráždi oči a pokožku, R36/38
sl: Draži oči in kožo, R36/38
sv: Irriterar ögonen och huden, R36/38

de: Reizt die Atmungsorgane, R37
en: Irritating to respiratory system, R37
cs: Dráždí dýchací orgány, R37
dk: Irriterer åndedrætsorganerne, R37
el: Ερεθίζει το αναπνευστικό σύστηµα, R37
es: Irrita las vías respiratorias, R37
et: Ärritab hingamiselundeid, R37
fi: Ärsyttää hengityselimiä, R37
fr: Irritant pour les voies respiratoires, R37
hu: Izgatja a légutakat, R37
it: Irritante per le vie respiratorie, R37
lt: Dirgina kvėpavimo takus, R37
lv: Kairina elpošanas sistēmu, R37
mt: Jirrita s-sistema respiratorja, R37
nl: Irriterend voor de ademhalingswegen, R37
no: Irriterer luftveiene, R37
pl: Działa drażniąco na drogi oddechowe, R37
pt: Irritante para as vias respiratórias, R37
sk: Dráždi dýchacie cesty, R37
sl: Draži dihala, R37
sv: Irriterar andningsorganen, R37

de: Reizt die Atmungsorgane und die Haut, R37/38
en: Irritating to respiratory system and skin, R37/38
cs: Dráždí dý chací orgány a kůži, R37/38
dk: Irriterer åndedrætsorganerne og huden, R37/38
el: Ερεθίζει το αναπνευστικό σύστηµα και το δέρµα, R37/38
es: Irrita las vías respiratorias y la piel, R37/38
et: Ärritab hingamiselundeid ja nahka, R37/38
fi: Ärsyttää hengityselimiä ja ihoa, R37/38
fr: Irritant pour les voies respiratoires et la peau, R37/38
hu: Bőrizgató hatású\, izgatja a légutakat, R37/38
it: Irritante per le vie respiratorie e la pelle, R37/38
lt: Dirgina kvėpavimo takus ir odą, R37/38
lv: Kairina elpošanas sistēmu un ādu, R37/38
mt: Jirrita s-sistema respiratorja u l-ġilda, R37/38
nl: Irriterend voor de ademhalingswegen en de huid, R37/38
no: Irriterer luftveiene og huden, R37/38
pl: Działa drażniąco na drogi oddechowe i skórę, R37/38
pt: Irritante para as vias respiratórias e pele, R37/38
sk: Dráždi dýchacie cesty a pokožku, R37/38
sl: Draži dihala in kožo, R37/38
sv: Irriterar andningsorganen och huden, R37/38

de: Reizt die Haut, R38
en: Irritating to skin, R38
cs: Dráždí kůži, R38
dk: Irriterer huden, R38
el: Ερεθίζει το δέρµα, R38
es: Irrita la piel, R38
et: Ärritab nahka, R38
fi: Ärsyttää ihoa, R38
fr: Irritant pour la peau, R38
hu: Bőrizgató hatású, R38
it: Irritante per la pelle, R38
lt: Dirgina odą, R38
lv: Kairina ādu, R38
mt: Jirrita l-ġilda, R38
nl: Irriterend voor de huid, R38
no: Irriterer huden, R38
pl: Działa drażniąco na skórę, R38
pt: Irritante para a pele, R38
sk: Dráždi pokožku, R38
sl: Draži kožo, R38
sv: Irriterar huden, R38

de: Ernste Gefahr irreversiblen Schadens, R39
en: Danger of very serious irreversible effects, R39
cs: Nebezpečí velmi vážných nevratných účinků, R39
dk: Fare for varig alvorlig skade på helbred, R39
el: Κίνδυνος πολύ σοβαρών µονίµων επιδράσεων, R39
es: Peligro de efectos irreversibles muy graves, R39
et: Väga tõsiste pöördumatute tervisekahjustuste oht, R39
fi: Erittäin vakavien pysyvien vaurioiden vaara, R39
fr: Danger d'effets irréversibles très graves, R39
hu: Nagyon súlyos és maradandó egészségkárosodást okozhat, R39
it: Pericolo di effetti irreversibili molto gravi, R39
lt: Sukelia labai sunkius negrįžtamus sveikatos pakenkimus, R39
lv: Būtiski neatgriezeniskas iedarbības draudi, R39
mt: Periklu ta' effetti serji irreversibbli, R39
nl: Gevaar voor ernstige onherstelbare effecten, R39
no: Fare for uhelbredelig skadevirkning, R39
pl: Zagraża powstaniem bardzo poważnych nieodwracalnych zmian w stanie zdrowia, R39
pt: Perigo de efeitos irreversíveis muito graves, R39
sk: Nebezpečenstvo vel’mi vážnych ireverzibilných účinkov, R39
sl: Nevarnost zelo hudih trajnih okvar zdravja, R39
sv: Risk för mycket allvarliga bestående hälsoskador, R39

de: Giftig: ernste Gefahr irreversiblen Schadens durch Einatmen, R39/23
en: Toxic: danger of very serious irreversible effects through inhalation, R39/23
cs: Toxický : nebezpečí velmi vážných nevratných účinků při vdechování, R39/23
dk: Giftig: fare for varig alvorlig skade på helbred ved indånding, R39/23
el: Τοξικό: κίνδυνος πολύ σοβαρών µόνιµων επιδράσεων όταν εισπνέ- εται, R39/23
es: Tóxico: peligro de efectos irreversibles muy graves por inhalación, R39/23
et: Mürgine: väga tõsiste pöördumatute kahjustuste oht sissehingamisel, R39/23
fi: Myrkyllistä: erittäin vakavien pysyvien vaurioiden vaara hengitettynä, R39/23
fr: Toxique: danger d'effets irréversibles très graves par inhalation, R39/23
hu: Belélegezve mérgező: nagyon súlyos\, maradandó egészségkárosodást okozhat, R39/23
it: Tossico: pericolo di effetti irreversibili molto gravi per inalazione, R39/23
lt: Toksiška: sukelia labai sunkius negrįžtamus sveikatos pakenkimus i ²kvėpus, R39/23
lv: Toksisks: būtiski neatgriezeniskas iedarbības draudi ieelpojot, R39/23
mt: Tossiku: periklu ta' effetti irriversibbli serji ħafna meta jinxtamm, R39/23
nl: Vergiftig: gevaar voor ernstige onherstelbare effecten bij inademing, R39/23
no: Giftig: Fare for uhelbredelig skadevirkning ved innånding, R39/23
pl: Działa toksycznie przez drogi oddechowe; zagraża powstaniem bardzo poważnych nieodwracalnych zmian w stanie zdrowia, R39/23
pt: Tóxico: perigo de efeitos irreversíveis muito graves por inalação, R39/23
sk: Jedovatý\, nebezpečenstvo vel’mi vážnych ireverzibilných účinkov vdýchnutím, R39/23
sl: Strupeno: nevarnost zelo hudih trajnih okvar zdravja pri vdihavanju, R39/23
sv: Giftigt: risk för mycket allvarliga bestående hälsoskador vid inandning, R39/23

de: Giftig: ernste Gefahr irreversiblen Schadens durch Einatmen und bei Berührung mit der Haut, R39/23/24
en: Toxic: danger of very serious irreversible effects through inhalation and in contact with skin, R39/23/24
cs: Toxický : nebezpečí velmi vážných nevratných účinků při vdechování a při styku s kůží, R39/23/24
dk: Giftig: fare for varig alvorlig skade på helbred ved indånding og hudkontakt, R39/23/24
el: Τοξικό: κίνδυνος πολύ σοβαρών µόνιµων επιδράσεων όταν εισπνέ- εται και σε επαφή µε το δέρµα, R39/23/24
es: Tóxico: peligro de efectos irreversibles muy graves por inhalación y contacto con la piel, R39/23/24
et: Mürgine: väga tõsiste pöördumatute kahjustuste oht sissehingamisel ja kokkupuutel nahaga, R39/23/24
fi: Myrkyllistä: erittäin vakavien pysyvien vaurioiden vaara hengitettynä ja joutuessaan iholle, R39/23/24
fr: Toxique: danger d'effets irréversibles très graves par inhalation et par contact avec la peau, R39/23/24
hu: Belélegezve és bőrrel érintkezve mérgező: nagyon súlyos\, maradandó egészségkárosodást okozhat, R39/23/24
it: Tossico: pericolo di effetti irreversibili molto gravi per inalazione e a contatto con la pelle, R39/23/24
lt: Toksiška: sukelia labai sunkius negrįžtamus sveikatos pakenkimus i ²kvėpus ir susilietus su oda, R39/23/24
lv: Toksisks: būtiski neatgriezeniskas iedarbības draudi ieelpojot un nonākot saskarē ar ādu, R39/23/24
mt: Tossiku: periklu ta' effetti irriversibbli serji ħafna meta jinxtamm u meta jmiss il-ġilda, R39/23/24
nl: Vergiftig: gevaar voor ernstige onherstelbare effecten bij inademing en aanraking met de huid, R39/23/24
no: Giftig: Fare for uhelbredelig skadevirkning ved innånding og hudkontakt, R39/23/24
pl: Działa toksycznie przez drogi oddechowe i w kontakcie ze skórą; zagraża powstaniem bardzo poważnych nieodwracalnych zmian w stanie zdrowia, R39/23/24
pt: Tóxico: perigo de efeitos irreversíveis muito graves por inalação e em contacto com a pele, R39/23/24
sk: Jedovatý\, nebezpečenstvo vel’mi vážnych ireverzibilných účinkov vdýchnutím a pri kontakte s pokožkou, R39/23/24
sl: Strupeno: nevarnost zelo hudih trajnih okvar zdravja pri vdihavanju in v stiku s kožo, R39/23/24
sv: Giftigt: risk för mycket allvarliga bestående hälsoskador vid inandning och hudkontakt, R39/23/24

de: Giftig: ernste Gefahr irreversiblen Schadens durch Einatmen\, Berührung mit der Haut und durch Verschlucken, R39/23/24/25
en: Toxic: danger of very serious irreversible effects through inhalation\, in contact with skin and if swallowed, R39/23/24/25
cs: Toxický : nebezpečí velmi vážných nevratných účinků při vdechování\, styku s kůží a při požití, R39/23/24/25
dk: Giftig: fare for varig alvorlig skade på helbred ved indånding\, hudkontakt og indtagelse, R39/23/24/25
el: Τοξικό: κίνδυνος πολύ σοβαρών µόνιµων επιδράσεων όταν εισπνέ- εται\, σε επαφή µε το δέρµα και σε περίπτωση καταπόσεως, R39/23/24/25
es: Tóxico: peligro de efectos irreversibles muy graves por inhalación\, contacto con la piel e ingestión, R39/23/24/25
et: Mürgine: väga tõsiste pöördumatute kahjustuste oht sissehingamisel\, kokkupuutel nahaga ja allaneelamisel, R39/23/24/25
fi: Myrkyllistä: erittäin vakavien pysyvien vaurioiden vaara hengitettynä\, joutuessaan iholle ja nieltynä, R39/23/24/25
fr: Toxique: danger d'effets irréversibles très graves par inhalation\, par contact avec la peau et par ingestion, R39/23/24/25
hu: Belélegezve\, bőrrel érintkezve és lenyelve mérgező: nagyon súlyos\, maradandó egészségkárosodást okozhat, R39/23/24/25
it: Tossico: pericolo di effetti irreversibili molto gravi per inalazione\, a contatto con la pelle e per ingestione, R39/23/24/25
lt: Toksiška: sukelia labai sunkius negrįžtamus sveikatos pakenkimus įkvėpus\, susilietus su oda ir prarijus, R39/23/24/25
lv: Toksisks – būtiski neatgriezeniskas iedarbības draudi ieelpojot\, nonākot saskarē ar ādu un norijot, R39/23/24/25
mt: Tossiku: periklu ta' effetti irriversibbli serji ħafna meta jinxtamm\, imiss il-ġilda jew meta jinbela', R39/23/24/25
nl: Vergiftig: gevaar voor ernstige onherstelbare effecten bij inademing\, aanraking met de huid en opname door de mond, R39/23/24/25
no: Giftig: Fare for uhelbredelig skadevirkning ved innånding\, hudkontakt og svelging, R39/23/24/25
pl: Działa toksycznie przez drogi oddechowe\, w kontakcie ze skórą i po połknięciu; zagraża powstaniem bardzo poważnych nieodwracalnych zmian w stanie zdrowia, R39/23/24/25
pt: Tóxico: perigo de efeitos irreversíveis muito graves por inalação\, em contacto com a pele e por ingestão, R39/23/24/25
sk: Jedovatý\, nebezpečenstvo vel’mi vážnych ireverzibilných účinkov vdý chnutím\, pri kontakte s pokožkou a po požití, R39/23/24/25
sl: Strupeno: nevarnost zelo hudih trajnih okvar zdravja pri vdihavanju\, v stiku s kožo in pri zaužitju, R39/23/24/25
sv: Giftigt\, risk för mycket allvarliga bestående skador vid inandning\, vid hudkontakt och vid förtäring, R39/23/24/25

de: Giftig: ernste Gefahr irreversiblen Schadens durch Einatmen und durch Verschlucken, R39/23/25
en: Toxic: danger of very serious irreversible effects through inhalation and if swallowed, R39/23/25
cs: Toxický : nebezpečí velmi vážných nevratných účinků při vdechování a při požití, R39/23/25
dk: Giftig: fare for varig alvorlig skade på helbred ved indånding og indtagelse, R39/23/25
el: Τοξικό: κίνδυνος πολύ σοβαρών µόνιµων επιδράσεων όταν εισπνέ- εται και σε περίπτωση καταπόσεως, R39/23/25
es: Tóxico: peligro de efectos irreversibles muy graves por inhalación e ingestión, R39/23/25
et: Mürgine: väga tõsiste pöördumatute kahjustuste oht sissehingamisel ja allaneelamisel, R39/23/25
fi: Myrkyllistä: erittäin vakavien pysyvien vaurioiden vaara hengitettynä ja nieltynä, R39/23/25
fr: Toxique: danger d'effets irréversibles très graves par inhalation et par ingestion, R39/23/25
hu: Belélegezve és lenyelve mérgező: nagyon súlyos\, maradandó egészségkárosodást okozhat, R39/23/25
it: Tossico: pericolo di effetti irreversibili molto gravi per inalazione e ingestione, R39/23/25
lt: Toksiška: sukelia labai sunkius negrįžtamus sveikatos pakenkimus įkvėpus ir prarijus, R39/23/25
lv: Toksisks: būtiski neatgriezeniskas iedarbības draudi ieelpojot un norijot, R39/23/25
mt: Tossiku: periklu ta' effetti irriversibbli serji ħafna meta jinxtamm jew meta jinbela', R39/23/25
nl: Vergiftig: gevaar voor ernstige onherstelbare effecten bij inademing en opname door de mond, R39/23/25
no: Giftig: Fare for uhelbredelig skadevirkning ved innånding og svelging, R39/23/25
pl: Działa toksycznie przez drogi oddechowe i po połknięciu; zagraża powstaniem bardzo poważnych nieodwracalnych zmian w stanie zdrowia, R39/23/25
pt: Tóxico: perigo de efeitos irreversíveis muito graves por inalação e ingestão, R39/23/25
sk: Jedovatý\, nebezpečenstvo vel’mi vážnych ireverzibilných účinkov vdýchnutím a po požití, R39/23/25
sl: Strupeno: nevarnost zelo hudih trajnih okvar zdravja pri vdihavanju in pri zaužitju, R39/23/25
sv: Giftigt: risk för mycket allvarliga bestående hälsoskador vid inandning och förtäring, R39/23/25

de: Giftig: ernste Gefahr irreversiblen Schadens bei Berührung mit der Haut, R39/24
en: Toxic: danger of very serious irreversible effects in contact with skin, R39/24
cs: Toxický : nebezpečí velmi vážných nevratných účinků při styku s kůží, R39/24
dk: Giftig: fare for varig alvorlig skade på helbred ved hudkontakt, R39/24
el: Τοξικό: κίνδυνος πολύ σοβαρών µόνιµων επιδράσεων σε επαφή µε το δέρµα, R39/24
es: Tóxico: peligro de efectos irreversibles muy graves por contacto con la piel, R39/24
et: Mürgine: väga tõsiste pöördumatute kahjustuste oht nahale sattumisel, R39/24
fi: Myrkyllistä: erittäin vakavien pysyvien vaurioiden vaara joutuessaan iholle, R39/24
fr: Toxique: danger d'effets irréversibles très graves par contact avec la peau, R39/24
hu: Bőrrel érintkezve mérgező: nagyon súlyos\, maradandó egészségkárosodást okozhat, R39/24
it: Tossico: pericolo di effetti irreversibili molto gravi a contatto con la pelle, R39/24
lt: Toksiška: sukelia labai sunkius negrįžtamus sveikatos pakenkimus susilietus su oda, R39/24
lv: Toksisks: būtiski neatgriezeniskas iedarbības draudi\, nonākot saskarē ar ādu, R39/24
mt: Tossiku: periklu ta' effetti irriversibbli serji ħafna meta jmiss ilġilda, R39/24
nl: Vergiftig: gevaar voor ernstige onherstelbare effecten bij aanraking met de huid, R39/24
no: Giftig: Fare for uhelbredelig skadevirkning ved hudkontakt, R39/24
pl: Działa toksycznie w kontakcie ze skórą; zagraża powstaniem bardzo poważnych nieodwracalnych zmian w stanie zdrowia, R39/24
pt: Tóxico: perigo de efeitos irreversíveis muito graves em contacto com a pele, R39/24
sk: Jedovatý\, nebezpečenstvo vel’mi vážnych ireverzibilných účinkov pri kontakte s pokožkou, R39/24
sl: Strupeno: nevarnost zelo hudih trajnih okvar zdravja v stiku s kožo, R39/24
sv: Giftigt: risk för mycket allvarliga bestående hälsoskador vid hudkontakt, R39/24

de: Giftig: ernste Gefahr irreversiblen Schadens bei Berührung mit der Haut und durch Verschlucken, R39/24/25
en: Toxic: danger of very serious irreversible effects in contact with skin and if swallowed, R39/24/25
cs: Toxický : nebezpečí velmi vážných nevratných účinků při styku s kůží a při požití, R39/24/25
dk: Giftig: fare for varig alvorlig skade på helbred ved hudkontakt og indtagelse, R39/24/25
el: Τοξικό: κίνδυνος πολύ σοβαρών µόνιµων επιδράσεων σε επαφή µε το δέρµα και σε περίπτωση καταπόσεως, R39/24/25
es: Tóxico: peligro de efectos irreversibles muy graves por contacto con la piel e ingestión, R39/24/25
et: Mürgine: väga tõsiste pöördumatute kahjustuste oht kokkupuutel nahaga ja allaneelamisel, R39/24/25
fi: Myrkyllistä: erittäin vakavien pysyvien vaurioiden vaara joutuessaan iholle ja nieltynä, R39/24/25
fr: Toxique: danger d'effets irréversibles très graves par contact avec la peau et par ingestion, R39/24/25
hu: Bőrrel érintkezve és lenyelve mérgező: nagyon súlyos\, maradandó egészségkárosodást okozhat, R39/24/25
it: Tossico: pericolo di effetti irreversibili molto gravi a contatto con la pelle e per ingestione, R39/24/25
lt: Toksiška: sukelia labai sunkius negrįžtamus sveikatos pakenkimus susilietus su oda ir prarijus, R39/24/25
lv: Toksisks – būtiski neatgriezeniskas iedarbības draudi\, nonākot saskarē ar ādu un norijot, R39/24/25
mt: Tossiku: periklu ta' effetti irriversibbli serji ħafna meta jmiss ilġilda jew meta jinbela', R39/24/25
nl: Vergiftig: gevaar voor ernstige onherstelbare effecten bij aanraking met de huid en opname door de mond, R39/24/25
no: Giftig: Fare for uhelbredelig skadevirkning ved hudkontakt og svelging, R39/24/25
pl: Działa toksycznie w kontakcie ze skórą i po połknięciu; zagraża powstaniem bardzo poważnych nieodwracalnych zmian w stanie zdrowia, R39/24/25
pt: Tóxico: perigo de efeitos irreversíveis muito graves em contacto com a pele e por ingestão, R39/24/25
sk: Jedovatý\, nebezpečenstvo vel’mi vážnych ireverzibilných účinkov pri kontakte s pokožkou a po požití, R39/24/25
sl: Strupeno: nevarnost zelo hudih trajnih okvar zdravja v stiku s kožo in pri zaužitju, R39/24/25
sv: Giftigt: risk för mycket allvarliga bestående hälsoskador vid hudkontakt och förtäring, R39/24/25

de: Giftig: ernste Gefahr irreversiblen Schadens durch Verschlucken, R39/25
en: Toxic: danger of very serious irreversible effects if swallowed, R39/25
cs: Toxický : nebezpečí velmi vážných nevratných účinků při požití, R39/25
dk: Giftig: fare for varig alvorlig skade på helbred ved indtagelse, R39/25
el: Τοξικό: κίνδυνος πολύ σοβαρών µόνιµων επιδράσεων σε περίπτωση καταπόσεως, R39/25
es: Tóxico: peligro de efectos irreversibles muy graves por ingestión, R39/25
et: Mürgine: väga tõsiste pöördumatute kahjustuste oht allaneelamisel, R39/25
fi: Myrkyllistä: errittäin vakavien pysyvien vaurioiden vaara nieltynä, R39/25
fr: Toxique: danger d'effets irréversibles très graves par ingestion, R39/25
hu: Lenyelve mérgező: nagyon súlyos\, maradandó egészségkárosodást okozhat, R39/25
it: Tossico: pericolo di effetti irreversibili molto gravi per ingestione, R39/25
lt: Toksiška: sukelia labai sunkius negrįžtamus sveikatos pakenkimus prarijus, R39/25
lv: Toksisks: būtiski neatgriezeniskas iedarbības draudi norijot, R39/25
mt: Tossiku: periklu ta' effetti irriversibbli serji ħafna jekk jinxtamm, R39/25
nl: Vergiftig: gevaar voor ernstige onherstelbare effecten bij opname door de mond, R39/25
no: Giftig: Fare for uhelbredelig skadevirkning ved svelging, R39/25
pl: Działa toksycznie po połknięciu; zagraża powstaniem bardzo poważnych nieodwracalnych zmian w stanie zdrowia, R39/25
pt: Tóxico: perigo de efeitos irreversíveis muito graves por ingestão, R39/25
sk: Jedovatý\, nebezpečenstvo vel’mi vážnych ireverzibilných účinkov po požití, R39/25
sl: Strupeno: nevarnost zelo hudih trajnih okvar zdravja pri zaužitju, R39/25
sv: Giftigt: risk för mycket allvarliga bestående hälsoskador vid förtäring, R39/25

de: Sehr giftig: ernste Gefahr irreversiblen Schadens durch Einatmen, R39/26
en: Very toxic: danger of very serious irreversible effects through inhalation, R39/26
cs: Vysoce toxický : nebezpečí velmi vážných nevratných účinků při vdechování, R39/26
dk: Meget giftig: fare for varig alvorlig skade på helbred ved indånding, R39/26
el: Πολύ τοξικό: κίνδυνος πολύ σοβαρών µόνιµων επιδράσεων όταν εισπνέεται, R39/26
es: Muy tóxico: peligro de efectos irreversibles muy graves por inhalación, R39/26
et: Väga mürgine: väga tõsiste pöördumatute kahjustuste oht sissehingamisel, R39/26
fi: Erittäin myrkyllistä: erittäin vakavien pysyvien vaurioiden vaara hengitettynä, R39/26
fr: Très toxique: danger d'effets irréversibles très graves par inhalation, R39/26
hu: Belélegezve nagyon mérgező: nagyon súlyos\, maradandó egészségkárosodást okozhat, R39/26
it: Molto tossico: pericolo di effetti irreversibili molto gravi per inalazione, R39/26
lt: Labai toksiška: sukelia labai sunkius negrįžtamus sveikatos pakenkimus įkvėpus, R39/26
lv: Ļoti toksisks – būtiski neatgriezeniskas iedarbības draudi ieelpojot, R39/26
mt: Tossiku ħafna: periklu ta' effetti irriversibbli serji ħafna meta jinxtamm, R39/26
nl: Zeer vergiftig: gevaar voor ernstige onherstelbare effecten bij inademing, R39/26
no: Meget giftig: Fare for uhelbredelig skadevirkning ved innånding, R39/26
pl: Działa bardzo toksycznie przez drogi oddechowe; zagraża powstaniem bardzo poważnych nieodwracalnych zmian w stanie zdrowia, R39/26
pt: Muito tóxico: perigo de efeitos irreversíveis muito graves por inalação, R39/26
sk: Vel’mi jedovatý\, nebezpečenstvo vel’mi vážnych ireverzibilných účinkov vdýchnutím, R39/26
sl: Zelo strupeno: nevarnost zelo hudih trajnih okvar zdravja pri vdihavanju, R39/26
sv: Mycket giftigt: risk för mycket allvarliga bestående hälsoskador vid inandning, R39/26

de: Sehr giftig: ernste Gefahr irreversiblen Schadens durch Einatmen und bei Berührung mit der Haut, R39/26/27
en: Very toxic: danger of very serious irreversible effects through inhalation and in contact with skin, R39/26/27
cs: Vysoce toxický : nebezpečí velmi vážných nevratných účinků při vdechování a při styku s kůží, R39/26/27
dk: Meget giftig: fare for varig alvorlig skade på helbred ved indånding og hudkontakt, R39/26/27
el: Πολύ τοξικό: κίνδυνος πολύ σοβαρών µόνιµων επιδράσεων όταν εισπνέεται και σε επαφή µε το δέρµα, R39/26/27
es: Muy tóxico: peligro de efectos irreversibles muy graves por inhalación y contacto con la piel, R39/26/27
et: Väga mürgine: väga tõsiste pöördumatute kahjustuste oht sissehingamisel ja kokkupuutel nahaga, R39/26/27
fi: Erittäin myrkyllistä: erittäin vakavien pysyvien vaurioiden vaara hengitettynä ja joutuessaan iholle, R39/26/27
fr: Très toxique: danger d'effets irréversibles très graves par inhalation et par contact avec la peau, R39/26/27
hu: Belélegezve és bőrrel érintkezve nagyon mérgező: nagyon súlyos\, maradandó egészségkárosodást okozhat, R39/26/27
it: Molto tossico: pericolo di effetti irreversibili molto gravi per inalazione e a contatto con la pelle, R39/26/27
lt: Labai toksiška: sukelia labai sunkius negrįžtamus sveikatos pakenkimus įkvėpus ir susilietus su oda, R39/26/27
lv: Ļoti toksisks – būtiski neatgriezeniskas iedarbības draudi ieelpojot un nonākot saskarē ar ādu, R39/26/27
mt: Tossiku ħafna: periklu ta' effetti irriversibbli serji ħafna meta jinxtamm u jmiss il-ġilda, R39/26/27
nl: Zeer vergiftig: gevaar voor ernstige onherstelbare effecten bij inademing en aanraking met de huid, R39/26/27
no: Meget giftig: Fare for uhelbredelig skadevirkning ved innånding og hudkontakt, R39/26/27
pl: Działa bardzo toksycznie przez drogi oddechowe i w kontakcie ze skórą; zagraża powstaniem bardzo poważnych nieodwracalnych zmian w stanie zdrowia, R39/26/27
pt: Muito tóxico: perigo de efeitos irreversíveis muito graves por inalação e em contacto com a pele, R39/26/27
sk: Vel’mi jedovatý\, nebezpečenstvo vel’mi vážnych ireverzibilných účinkov vdýchnutím a pri kontakte s pokožkou, R39/26/27
sl: Zelo strupeno: nevarnost zelo hudih trajnih okvar zdravja pri vdihavanju in v stiku s kožo, R39/26/27
sv: Mycket giftigt: risk för mycket allvarliga bestående häloskador vid inandning och hudkontakt, R39/26/27

de: Sehr giftig: ernste Gefahr irreversiblen Schadens durch Einatmen\, Berührung mit der Haut und durch Verschlucken, R39/26/27/28
en: Very toxic: danger of very serious irreversible effects through inhalation\, in contact with skin and if swallowed, R39/26/27/28
cs: Vysoce toxický : nebezpečí velmi vážných nevratných účinků při vdechování\, styku s kůží a při požití, R39/26/27/28
dk: Meget giftig: fare for varig alvorlig skade på helbred ved indånding\, hudkontakt og indtagelse, R39/26/27/28
el: Πολύ τοξικό: κίνδυνος πολύ σοβαρών µόνιµων επιδράσεων όταν εισπνέεται\, σε επαφή µε το δέρµα και σε περίπτωση καταπόσεως, R39/26/27/28
es: Muy tóxico: peligro de efectos irreversibles muy graves por inhalación\, contacto con la piel e ingestión, R39/26/27/28
et: Väga mürgine: väga tõsiste pöördumatute kahjustuste oht sissehingamisel\, kokkupuutel nahaga ja allaneelamisel, R39/26/27/28
fi: Erittäin myrkyllistä: erittäin vakavien pysyvien vaurioiden vaara hengitettynä\, joutuessaan iholle ja nieltynä, R39/26/27/28
fr: Très toxique: danger d'effets irréversibles très graves par inhalation\, par contact avec la peau et par ingestion, R39/26/27/28
hu: Belélegezve\, bőrrel érintkezve\, lenyelve nagyon mérgező: nagyon súlyos\, maradandó egészségkárosodást okozhat, R39/26/27/28
it: Molto tossico: pericolo di effetti irreversibili molto gravi per inalazione\, a contatto con la pelle e per ingestione, R39/26/27/28
lt: Labai toksiška: sukelia labai sunkius negrįžtamus sveikatos pakenkimus įkvėpus\, susilietus su oda ir prarijus, R39/26/27/28
lv: Ļoti toksisks – būtiski neatgriezeniskas iedarbības draudi ieelpojot\, nonākot saskarē ar ādu vai norijot, R39/26/27/28
mt: Tossiku ħafna: periklu ta' effetti irriversibbli serji ħafna meta jinxtamm\, imiss il-ġilda u jekk jinbela', R39/26/27/28
nl: Zeer vergiftig: gevaar voor ernstige onherstelbare effecten bij inademing\, aanraking met de huid en opname door de mond, R39/26/27/28
no: Meget giftig: Fare for uhelbredelig skadevirkning ved innånding\, hudkontakt og svelging, R39/26/27/28
pl: Działa bardzo toksycznie przez drogi oddechowe\, w kontakcie ze skórą i po połknięciu; zagraża powstaniem bardzo poważnych nieodwracalnych zmian w stanie zdrowia, R39/26/27/28
pt: Muito tóxico: perigo de efeitos irreversíveis muito graves por inalação\, em contacto com a pele e por ingestão, R39/26/27/28
sk: Vel’mi jedovatý\, nebezpečenstvo vel’mi vážnych ireverzibilných účinkov vdý chnutím\, pri kontakte s pokožkou a po požití, R39/26/27/28
sl: Zelo strupeno: nevarnost zelo hudih trajnih okvar zdravja pri vdihavanju\, v stiku s kožo in pri zaužitju, R39/26/27/28
sv: Mycket giftigt: risk för mycket allvarliga bestående hälsoskador vid inandning\, hudkontakt och förtäring, R39/26/27/28

de: Sehr giftig: ernste Gefahr irreversiblen Schadens durch Einatmen und durch Verschlucken, R39/26/28
en: Very toxic: danger of very serious irreversible effects through inhalation and if swallowed, R39/26/28
cs: Vysoce toxický : nebezpečí velmi vážných nevratných účinků při vdechování a při požití, R39/26/28
dk: Meget giftig: fare for varig alvorlig skade på helbred ved indånding og indtagelse, R39/26/28
el: Πολύ τοξικό: κίνδυνος πολύ σοβαρών µόνιµων επιδράσεων όταν εισπνέεται και σε περίπτωση καταπόσεως, R39/26/28
es: Muy tóxico: peligro de efectos irreversibles muy graves por inhalación e ingestión, R39/26/28
et: Väga mürgine: väga tõsiste pöördumatute kahjustuste oht sissehingamisel ja allaneelamisel, R39/26/28
fi: Erittäin myrkyllistä: erittäin vakavien pysyvien vaurioiden vaara hengitettynä ja nieltynä, R39/26/28
fr: Très toxique: danger d'effets irréversibles très graves par inhalation et par ingestion, R39/26/28
hu: Belélegezve és lenyelve nagyon mérgező: nagyon súlyos\, maradandó egészségkárosodást okozhat, R39/26/28
it: Molto tossico: pericolo di effetti irreversibili molto gravi per inalazione e ingestione, R39/26/28
lt: Labai toksiška: sukelia labai sunkius negrįžtamus sveikatos pakenkimus įkvėpus ir prarijus, R39/26/28
lv: Ļoti toksisks – būtiski neatgriezeniskas iedarbības draudi ieelpojot un norijot, R39/26/28
mt: Tossiku ħafna: periklu ta' effetti irriversibbli serji ħafna meta jinxtamm u jekk jinbela', R39/26/28
nl: Zeer vergiftig: gevaar voor ernstige onherstelbare effecten bij inademing en opname door de mond, R39/26/28
no: Meget giftig: Fare for uhelbredelig skadevirkning ved innånding og svelging, R39/26/28
pl: Działa bardzo toksycznie przez drogi oddechowe i po połknięciu; zagraża powstaniem bardzo poważnych nieodwracalnych zmian w stanie zdrowia, R39/26/28
pt: Muito tóxico: perigo de efeitos irreversíveis muito graves por inalação e ingestão, R39/26/28
sk: Vel’mi jedovatý\, nebezpečenstvo vel’mi vážnych ireverzibilných účinkov vdýchnutím a po požití, R39/26/28
sl: Zelo strupeno: nevarnost zelo hudih trajnih okvar zdravja pri vdihavanju in pri zaužitju, R39/26/28
sv: Mycket giftigt: risk för mycket allvarliga bestående hälsoskador vid inandning och förtäring, R39/26/28

de: Sehr giftig: ernste Gefahr irreversiblen Schadens bei Berührung mit der Haut, R39/27
en: Very toxic: danger of very serious irreversible effects in contact with skin, R39/27
cs: Vysoce toxický : nebezpečí velmi vážných nevratných účinků při styku s kůží, R39/27
dk: Meget giftig: fare for varig alvorlig skade på helbred ved hudkontakt, R39/27
el: Πολύ τοξικό: κίνδυνος πολύ σοβαρών µόνιµων επιδράσεων σε επαφή µε το δέρµα, R39/27
es: Muy tóxico: peligro de efectos irreversibles muy graves por contacto con la piel, R39/27
et: Väga mürgine: väga tõsiste pöördumatute kahjustuste oht kokkupuutel nahaga, R39/27
fi: Erittäin myrkyllistä: erittäin vakavien pysyvien vaurioiden vaara joutuessaan iholle, R39/27
fr: Très toxique: danger d'effets irréversibles très graves par contact avec la peau, R39/27
hu: Bőrrel érintkezve nagyon mérgező: nagyon súlyos\, maradandó egészségkárosodást okozhat, R39/27
it: Molto tossico: pericolo di effetti irreversibili molto gravi a contatto con la pelle, R39/27
lt: Labai toksiška: sukelia labai sunkius negrįžtamus sveikatos pakenkimus susilietus su oda, R39/27
lv: Ļoti toksisks – būtiski neatgriezeniskas iedarbības draudi\, nonākot saskarē ar ādu, R39/27
mt: Tossiku ħafna: periklu ta' effetti irriversibbli serji ħafna meta jmiss il-ġilda, R39/27
nl: Zeer vergiftig: gevaar voor ernstige onherstelbare effecten bij aanraking met de huid, R39/27
no: Meget giftig: Fare for uhelbredelig skadevirkning ved hudkontakt, R39/27
pl: Działa bardzo toksycznie w kontakcie ze skórą; zagraża powstaniem bardzo poważnych nieodwracalnych zmian w stanie zdrowia, R39/27
pt: Muito tóxico: perigo de efeitos irreversíveis muito graves em contacto com a pele, R39/27
sk: Vel’mi jedovatý\, nebezpečenstvo vel’mi vážnych ireverzibilných účinkov pri kontakte s pokožkou, R39/27
sl: Zelo strupeno: nevarnost zelo hudih trajnih okvar zdravja v stiku s kožo, R39/27
sv: Mycket giftigt: risk för mycket allvarliga bestående hälsoskador vid hudkontakt, R39/27

de: Sehr giftig: ernste Gefahr irreversiblen Schadens bei Berührung mit der Haut und durch Verschlucken, R39/27/28
en: Very toxic: danger of very serious irreversible effects in contact with skin and if swallowed, R39/27/28
cs: Vysoce toxický : nebezpečí velmi vážných nevratných účinků při styku s kůží a při požití, R39/27/28
dk: Meget giftig: fare for varig alvorlig skade på helbred ved hudkontakt og indtagelse, R39/27/28
el: Πολύ τοξικό: κίνδυνος πολύ σοβαρών µόνιµων επιδράσεων σε επαφή µε το δέρµα και σε περίπτωση καταπόσεως, R39/27/28
es: Muy tóxico: peligro de efectos irreversibles muy graves por contacto con la piel e ingestión, R39/27/28
et: Väga mürgine: väga tõsiste pöördumatute kahjustuste oht kokkupuutel nahaga ja allaneelamisel, R39/27/28
fi: Erittäin myrkyllistä: erittäin vakavien pysyvien vaurioiden vaara joutuessaan iholle ja nieltynä, R39/27/28
fr: Très toxique: danger d'effets irréversibles très graves par contact avec la peau et par ingestion, R39/27/28
hu: Bőrrel érintkezve és lenyelve nagyon mérgező: nagyon súlyos\, maradandó egészségkárosodást okozhat, R39/27/28
it: Molto tossico: pericolo di effetti irreversibili molto gravi a contatto con la pelle e per ingestione, R39/27/28
lt: Labai toksiška: sukelia labai sunkius negrįžtamus sveikatos pakenkimus susilietus su oda ir prarijus, R39/27/28
lv: Ļoti toksisks – būtiski neatgriezeniskas iedarbības draudi\, nonākot saskarē ar ādu un norijot, R39/27/28
mt: Tossiku ħafna: periklu ta' effetti irriversibbli serji ħafna meta jmiss il-ġilda u jekk jinbela', R39/27/28
nl: Zeer vergiftig: gevaar voor ernstige onherstelbare effecten bij aanraking met de huid en opname door de mond, R39/27/28
no: Meget giftig: Fare for uhelbredelig skadevirkning ved hudkontakt og svelging, R39/27/28
pl: Działa bardzo toksycznie w kontaktcie ze skórą i po połknięciu; zagraża powstaniem bardzo poważnych nieodwracalnych zmian w stanie zdrowia, R39/27/28
pt: Muito tóxico: perigo de efeitos irreversíveis muito graves em contacto com a pele e por ingestão, R39/27/28
sk: Vel’mi jedovatý\, nebezpečenstvo vel’mi vážnych ireverzibilných účinkov pri kontakte s pokožkou a po požití, R39/27/28
sl: Zelo strupeno: nevarnost zelo hudih trajnih okvar zdravja v stiku s kožo in pri zaužitju, R39/27/28
sv: Mycket giftigt: risk för mycket allvarliga bestående hälsoskador vid hudkontakt och förtäring, R39/27/28

de: Sehr giftig: ernste Gefahr irreversiblen Schadens durch Verschlucken, R39/28
en: Very toxic: danger of very serious irreversible effects if swallowed, R39/28
cs: Vysoce toxický : nebezpečí velmi vážných nevratných účinků při požití, R39/28
dk: Meget giftig: fare for varig alvorlig skade på helbred ved indtagelse, R39/28
el: Πολύ τοξικό: κίνδυνος πολύ σοβαρών µόνιµων επιδράσεων σε περί- πτωση καταπόσεως, R39/28
es: Muy tóxico: peligro de efectos irreversibles muy graves por ingestión, R39/28
et: Väga mürgine: väga tõsiste pöördumatute kahjustuste oht allaneelamisel, R39/28
fi: Erittäin myrkyllistä: erittäin vakavien pysyvien vaurioiden vaara nieltynä, R39/28
fr: Très toxique: danger d'effets irréversibles très graves par ingestion, R39/28
hu: Lenyelve nagyon mérgező: nagyon súlyos\, maradandó egészségkárosodást okozhat, R39/28
it: Molto tossico: pericolo di effetti irreversibili molto gravi per ingestione, R39/28
lt: Labai toksiška: sukelia labai sunkius negrįžtamus sveikatos pakenkimus prarijus, R39/28
lv: Ļoti toksisks – būtiski neatgriezeniskas iedarbības draudi norijot, R39/28
mt: Tossiku ħafna: periklu ta' effetti irriversibbli serji ħafna jekk jinbela', R39/28
nl: Zeer vergiftig: gevaar voor ernstige onherstelbare effecten bij opname door de mond, R39/28
no: Meget giftig: Fare for uhelbredelig skadevirkning ved svelging, R39/28
pl: Działa bardzo toksycznie po połknięciu; zagraża powstaniem bardzo poważnych nieodwracalnych zmian w stanie zdrowia, R39/28
pt: Muito tóxico: perigo de efeitos irreversíveis muito graves por ingestão, R39/28
sk: Vel’mi jedovatý\, nebezpečenstvo vel’mi vážnych ireverzibilných účinkov po požití, R39/28
sl: Zelo strupeno: nevarnost zelo hudih trajnih okvar zdravja pri zaužitju, R39/28
sv: Mycket giftigt: risk för mycket allvarliga bestående hälsoskador vid förtäring, R39/28

de: Bildet hochempfindliche explosionsgefährliche Metallverbindungen, R4
en: Forms very sensitive explosive metallic compounds, R4
cs: Vytváří vysoce výbušné kovové sloučeniny, R4
dk: Danner meget følsomme eksplosive metalforbindelser, R4
el: Σχηµατίζει πολύ ευαίσθητες εκρηκτικές µεταλλικές ενώσεις, R4
es: Forma compuestos metálicos explosivos muy sensibles, R4
et: Moodustab väga plahvatusohtlikke metalliühendeid, R4
fi: Muodostaa erittäin herkästi räjähtäviä metalliyhdisteitä, R4
fr: Forme des composés métalliques explosifs très sensibles, R4
hu: Nagyon érzékeny\, robbanásveszélyes fémvegyületeket képez, R4
it: Forma composti metallici esplosivi molto sensibili, R4
lt: Sudaro labai jautrius sprogstamuosius metalo junginius, R4
lv: Veido sprādzienbīstamus savienojumus ar metāliem, R4
mt: Jifforma komposti metalliċi esplussivi sensittivi ħafna, R4
nl: Vormt met metalen zeer gemakkelijk ontplofbare verbindingen, R4
no: Danner meget følsomme eksplosjonsfarlige metallforbindelser, R4
pl: Tworzy łatwo wybuchające związki metaliczne, R4
pt: Forma compostos metálicos explosivos muito sensíveis, R4
sk: Vytvára vel’mi citlivé výbušné zlúčeniny kovov, R4
sl: Tvori zelo občutljive eksplozivne kovinske spojine, R4
sv: Bildar mycket känsliga explosiva metallföreningar, R4